en: grape, vine fruit, mixed vine fruit
af: druiwe
am: ወይን
an: uga
ar: عنب
as: আঙুৰ
az: üzüm
ba: йөҙөм
be: вінаградзіна
bg: грозде
bn: আঙুর
bo: རྒུནའབྲུམ།
br: rezin
bs: grožđe
ca: raïm, raim
cs: bobule
cy: grawnwin
da: drue, druer
de: Traube, Trauben
dv: މޭބިސްކަދުރު
el: σταφύλι
eo: vinbero
es: uva
et: viinamari
eu: mahats
fa: انگور
fi: viinirypäle, rypäle
fj: qerepi
fr: raisin
ga: fíonchaor
gl: uva
gn: úva
gu: દ્રાક્ષ
gv: smeyr-feeyney
he: ענב
hi: अंगूर
hr: grožđe, grožđa
ht: rezen
hu: szőlő
hy: Խաղող
ia: uva
id: anggur
io: vito
is: vínber
it: uva, frutto della vite
ja: ブドウ, ぶどう
jv: anggur
ka: ყურძენი
kk: жүзім
km: ទំពាំងបាយជូរ
kn: ದ್ರಾಕ್ಷಿ
ko: 포도
ks: دَچھ
ku: tirî
ky: жүзүм
la: uva
ln: víno
lt: vynuogė
lv: vīnogas
mg: voaloboka
mk: грозје
ml: മുന്തിരിങ്ങ
mn: усан үзэм
mr: द्राक्ष
ms: anggur
my: စပျစ်ပင်
nb: druer
ne: अङ्गूर
nl: druif, druiven
nn: drue
nv: chʼil naʼatłʼoʼii
oc: rasim
or: ଅଙ୍ଗୁର
pa: ਅੰਗੂਰ
pl: winogrono, winogrona, winogron, winogronowy, winogronowa, winogronowe
ps: انګور
pt: uva
qu: uwas
ro: strugure
ru: виноград
sa: द्राक्षा
sc: bide
sd: انگور
sh: grožđe
sk: vinič
sl: grozdje
so: canab
sq: rrushi
sr: грожђе
su: anggur
sv: druva, druvor, vindruva, vindruvor, druv
sw: zabibu
ta: திராட்சை
te: ద్రాక్ష
tg: ангур
th: องุ่น
tl: ubas
tr: üzüm
tt: йөзем
ug: قۇرۇق ئۈزۈم
uk: виноград
ur: انگور
vi: nho
wa: roejhén
yi: וויינטרויבן
za: makit
zh: 葡萄

en: seedless grape
da: stenfri vindrue
de: kernlose Traube, kernlose Trauben
fr: raisin sans pépin
hr: grožđe bez sjemenki
it: uva senza semi
sv: kärnfri vindruva

en: grape seed, grape seeds
de: Traubenkerne
es: semilla de uva
fr: pépin de raisin, pépins de raisin, Pépins de raisins
hr: sjemenka grožđa

en: white grape, green grape
bg: бяло грозде
da: grøn vindrue, grønne vindruer
de: weiße Traube
es: uva blanca
fi: vaalea viinirypäle
fr: raisin blanc, raisins blancs
hr: bijelog grožđa, bijelo grožđe
it: uva bianca
nl: witte druif, witte druiven
pl: białe winogrona, winogrona białe, białych winogron
sv: grön vindruva, gröna vindruvor

en: white seedless grape
de: weiße kernlose Traube, weiße kernlose Trauben
fr: raisin blanc sans pépin
it: uva bianca senza semi

en: grapes of other varieties
de: verschiedene Traubensorten
es: uva de otras variedades
hr: grožđe drugih sorti
it: uve di altre varietà

en: tempranillo grape
de: Tempranillo, Tempranillo-Traube
es: uva tempranillo
hr: tempranillo grožđe
it: uva Tempranillo

en: black grape
bg: черно грозде
de: dunkle Trauben
fr: raisin noir, raisins noirs
hr: crno grožđe
it: uva nera

en: Concord grape, Concord black grape
de: Concord-Traube, Concord-Trauben, Concord Trauben
es: uva Concord, uva negra Concord
fr: raisin Concord, raisin noir Concord
hr: concord grožđe
it: uva Concord, uva nera Concord
nl: Concord-druif, Concord zwarte druif

en: red grape
ar: عنب أحمر
bg: червено грозде
da: rød vindrue
de: rote Traube, rote Trauben
es: uva roja, uvas rojas
fr: raisin rouge, raisins rouges
hr: crveno grožđe
it: uva rossa, uve rosse
nl: rode druif, rode druiven
pl: czerwone winogrona, czerwone winogrono, czerwonych winogron, winogronowy czerwony
pt: uva vermelha, uvas vermelhas
sv: röd vindruva

en: red seedless grape
da: stenfri rød vindrue
de: rote kernlose Traube, rote kernlose Trauben
fr: raisin rouge sans pépin
hr: crveno grožđe bez sjemenki
it: uva rossa senza semi
sv: kärnfri röd vindruva

en: Flame grape, Flame Seedless
da: flame-vindrue
sv: flame-vindruva

en: Prime Seedless grape
xx: Prime Seedless
da: prime seedless-vindrue
sv: Prime Seedless-vindruva

en: Starlight grape, Starlight red seedless grape
xx: Starlight
da: Starlight-vindrue
sv: Starlight-vindruva

en: raisin, raisins
ar: زبيب
az: Kişmiş
be: Разынкі
bg: Стафида, стафиди
bs: Grožđica
ca: pansa, panses
cs: rozinka, rozinky
da: rosin, rosiner
de: Rosine, Rosinen, Weinbeere
el: Σταφίδα
eo: sekvinbero
es: uvas pasas, pasas, uva desecada
et: Rosin
eu: Mahaspasa
fa: کشمش
fi: rusina, rusinat
fr: raisin sec, raisins sec
ga: Rísín
gl: Pasa
he: צימוק
hi: किशमिश
hr: grožđice, suho grožđe
hu: mazsola
hy: Չամիչ
id: Kismis
ik: Asiayaaq
is: Rúsína
it: Uva passa
ja: レーズン
jv: Kismis
ka: ჩამიჩი
kn: ಒಣದ್ರಾಕ್ಷಿ
ko: 건포도
ku: Mewîj
ky: Мейиз
lb: Korënt
lt: Razina
lv: rozīnes
mr: मनुका
ms: Kismis
nb: rosin
ne: किसमिस
nl: rozijn, rozijnen
nn: rosin
no: rosin, rosiner
pa: ਮੁਨੱਕਾ
pl: rodzynki, rodzynka
pt: passa de uva, passas de uva, passa, passas
qu: Pasa
ro: Stafidă, stafide
ru: Изюм, виноград сушеный
sd: ڪشمش
sk: Hrozienka
sl: Rozine
so: Sabiib
sq: rrush
sr: Суво грожђе
su: Kismis
sv: russin
ta: உலர்திராட்சை
te: ఎండుద్రాక్ష
tg: Мавиз
th: ลูกเกด
tl: Pasas
tr: Kuru üzüm
uk: Родзинки
vi: Nho khô
yi: ראזשינקע
zh: 葡萄乾

en: raisin concentrate
de: Rosinenkonzentrat
es: concentrado de pasas de uva
fi: rusinatiiviste
fr: concentré de raisin
hr: koncentrat grožđica
it: concentrato di uva passa

en: sultana, sultanas, sultanina, Thompson Seedless, Lady de Coverly
af: sultana
ar: العنب الكشمشي
bg: султанина, светли стафиди
ca: panses sultanes
da: sultana
de: Sultana, Sultanine, Sultanina, Sultaninen
el: σουλτανίνα
eo: sultanino
es: sultanina, sultana, pasas sultanas, uvas pasas sultanas
et: sultana
fa: انگور سلطانی
fi: sulttaanirusina, sulttaanirusinoita
fr: sultanine, sultanines
ga: sabhdánach
he: סולטנה
hi: सुल्ताना
hr: sultanija
id: sultana
it: sultanina, uva sultanina, uvetta, uvetta sultanina
ja: サルタナ
kn: ಸುಲ್ತಾನ
ko: 설태너
mk: суво грозје
ms: sultana
nl: sultana, sultanas
pl: rodzynki sułtańskie, rodzynki sułtanki
pt: sultanina, sultanas
ro: sultanină
ru: белый кишмиш
si: සුල්තානා
sl: sultanina
sv: sultanvindruva, sultandruva, Thompson-druva, Thompson-druvor
tr: sultaniye üzümü
uk: кишмиш
uz: kishmish
zh: 蘇丹娜葡萄

en: sultana raisin, Raisin Thompson Seedless, sultana raisins
fr: raisins secs sultanines
pl: rodzynki thompson jumbo
sv: sultanrussin, Sultan-russin, Thompson-russin

en: oiled sultana
de: Sultaninen geölt
it: uva sultanina oleosa

en: California seedless raisin, California seedless raisins
de: Kalifornische kernlose Rosinen
fr: Raisins secs sans grains californiens
hr: kalifornijske grožđice bez sjemenki
it: uvetta senza semi della California
sv: kaliforniska russin utan kärnor